Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Chapter 03. The Unorganized Borough.

Sec. 29.03.010.
Establishment.

Areas of the state that are not within the boundaries of an organized borough constitute a single unorganized borough.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1972)

Cross references. —

For studies of the feasibility of establishing boroughs in the unorganized borough, see AS

44.33.840

—

44.33.849

.

Sec. 29.03.020.
Service areas.

Allowing for maximum local participation, the legislature may establish, alter, or abolish service areas within the unorganized borough to provide special services that may include schools, utilities, land use regulations, and fire protection. A new service area may not be established if the new service can be provided by an existing service area, by incorporation as a city, or by annexation to a city.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1972; am § 24 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, deleted “, but are not limited to” following “special services that may include”.

Sec. 29.03.030.
Platting authority.

The Department of Natural Resources is the platting authority for the state except within a municipality that has the power of land use regulation and that is exercising platting authority.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For platting outside municipalities that have the power of land use regulation and that are exercising platting authority, see AS

40.15.300

—

40.15.900

.